Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 General Provisions
37-1-120. Contents of petition.

All petitions shall be verified and may be on information and belief.

Petitions that allege a delinquent or unruly offense; educational neglect when filed on behalf of a school; child abuse prosecutions, pursuant to §§ 37-1-412 and 39-15-401; nonsupport of children, pursuant to title 39, chapter 15, part 1; contributing to the delinquency or unruly behavior of a child, pursuant to § 37-1-156; contributing to the dependency and neglect of a child, pursuant to § 37-1-157; offenses involving adults arising under title 49, chapter 6, part 30; criminal contempt, pursuant to § 29-9-102; and civil contempt, pursuant to §§ 29-9-104 and 29-9-105 shall set forth plainly and to the extent reasonably ascertainable:

The facts that bring the child or person within the jurisdiction of the court, including the approximate date, manner, and place of the acts alleged, with a statement that it is in the best interest of the child and the public that the proceeding be brought;

If the petition alleges delinquency or unruly conduct, the offense charged, the relevant statutes, and a statement that the child is in need of treatment or rehabilitation;

The name, age, and residence address, if any, of the child on whose behalf the petition is brought;

The names and residence addresses, if known to petitioner, of the legal parents, guardian, or custodian of the child;

The names and residence addresses, if known to the petitioner, of any person or persons, other than the legal father, alleged to be the biological father of the child whose parental rights have not been terminated;

If the child is in detention, the place of detention, and the time the child was taken into custody; and

If any other court has jurisdiction over the child and the name of the court, if known to the petitioner.

All other petitions shall set forth plainly and to the extent reasonably ascertainable:

The facts that bring the child within the jurisdiction of the court, including the approximate date, manner, and place of the acts alleged, with a statement that it is in the best interest of the child and the public that the proceeding be brought;

The name, age, and residence address, if any, of the child on whose behalf the petition is brought and the places where the child has lived for the last five (5) years, and the names and present addresses of the persons with whom the child has lived during that period;

The names and residence addresses, if known to petitioner, of the legal parents, guardian, or custodian of the child and of the child's spouse, or of any person who has physical custody of the child or claims rights of legal or physical custody of, or visitation with the child;

The names and residence addresses, if known to the petitioner, of any person or persons, other than the legal father, alleged to be the biological father of the child whose parental rights have not been terminated;

The court, case number, and nature of any proceeding, if known to the petitioner, that could affect the current proceeding including proceedings for custody, visitation, enforcement, domestic violence, protective orders, termination of parental rights, or adoption;

A statement whether the petitioner has participated as a party or witness or in any other capacity, in any other proceeding concerning the custody of or visitation with the child and, if so, a statement that identifies the court, the case number, and the date of the child custody determination, if any;

A statement whether or not the parents are currently serving in the armed forces; and

A statement whether the child or child's parent is a member or eligible for membership in any recognized Indian tribe under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. § 1901).

If the petitioner, counter-petitioner, or child is a victim of abuse or has been placed at risk of abuse by any of the parties to the proceeding, the petitioner may exclude the address of the petitioner or the child from the petition and file that information with the clerk in a separate document, which the clerk shall place under seal.

School personnel may file a juvenile petition against a student receiving special education services only in accordance with the manifestation determination requirements of § 49-10-1304(d)(3)(B).

Absent serious threats to school safety or exceptional circumstances in the judgment of a law enforcement officer, when a delinquency or unruly petition is filed by school personnel based upon acts committed on school grounds or at a school-sponsored event, the school personnel shall include information in the petition that shows that:

School personnel have sought to resolve the problem through available educational approaches; and

Court intervention is needed in the judgment of the petitioner.

School personnel shall seek to engage parents, guardians, or legal custodians in resolving the child's behavior before filing a petition where appropriate under the circumstances.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 20; T.C.A., § 37-220; Acts 2012, ch. 1017, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 598, § 4; 2017, ch. 263, § 2; 2018, ch. 1052, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1017, § 4 provided that the act, which amended subdivision (3) and added present subdivision (4), shall apply to any proceeding commenced on or after July 1, 2012.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment inserted “and to the extent reasonably ascertainable:” to the end of the introductory language; inserted “, including the approximate date, manner, and place of the acts alleged,” following “court” in (1); added “and the places where the child has lived for the last five (5) years, and the names and present addresses of the persons with whom the child has lived during that period;” to the end of (2); substituted “or of any person who has physical custody of the child or claims rights of legal or physical custody of, or visitation with the child;” for “if any” at the end of (3); deleted “and” at the end of (4); added current (5)-(7); redesignated former (5) as (8); deleted “custody and, if so, the place of” preceding “detention” at the beginning of current (8); inserted “, the place of detention,” following “detention” in the middle of current (8), and added current (9).

The 2017 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “The petition shall be verified and may be on information and belief. It shall set forth plainly and to the extent reasonably ascertainable:“(1) The facts that bring the child within the jurisdiction of the court, including the approximate date, manner, and place of the acts alleged, with a statement that it is in the best interest of the child and the public that the proceeding be brought and, if delinquency or unruly conduct is alleged, that the child is in need of treatment or rehabilitation;“(2) The name, age, and residence address, if any, of the child on whose behalf the petition is brought and the places where the child has lived for the last five (5) years, and the names and present addresses of the persons with whom the child has lived during that period;“(3) The names and residence addresses, if known to petitioner, of the legal parents, guardian, or custodian of the child and of the child's spouse, or of any person who has physical custody of the child or claims rights of legal or physical custody of, or visitation with the child;“(4) The names, and residence addresses, if known to the petitioner, of any persons, other than the legal father, alleged to be the biological father of the child whose parental rights have not been terminated;“(5) The court, case number, and nature of any proceeding, if known to the petitioner, that could affect the current proceeding including proceedings for custody, visitation, enforcement, domestic violence, protective orders, termination of parental rights, or adoption“(6) A statement whether the petitioner has participated as a party or witness or in any other capacity, in any other proceeding concerning the custody of or visitation with the child and, if so, a statement that identifies the court, the case number, and the date of the child custody determination, if any;“(7) A statement whether or not the parents are currently serving in the armed forces;“(8) If the child is in detention, the place of detention, and the time the child was taken into custody; and“(9) A statement whether the child or child's parent is a member or eligible for membership in any recognized Indian tribe under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. § 1901).”

The 2018 amendment added (e) and (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 598, § 5. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 263, § 5. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

37-1-121. Service of process.

Service of process for juvenile court proceedings may be completed by any individual authorized to serve process under the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure or the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure, including, but not limited to, a sheriff, constable, or private process server.

Acts 2018, ch. 535, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §37-1-121, repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 717, § 1, effective July 1, 2016, concerned summons.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 535, § 3. March 7, 2018.

37-1-122. Summons — Attachment where summons ineffectual.

After the petition has been filed, the clerk shall schedule a time for a hearing and issue summonses to the parties. In case a summons cannot be served or the party served fails to obey the same, and in any case where it is made to appear to the court that such summons will be ineffectual, except as described in subsection (b), an attachment may issue, on the order of the court, against the:

Parent or guardian;

Person having custody of the child;

Person with whom the child may be; or

Child.

An attachment for a violation of conditions or limitations of probation pursuant to § 37-1-131 or § 37-1-132, home placement supervision pursuant to § 37-1-137, or diversion pursuant to § 37-1-129 shall not issue unless:

The child poses a significant likelihood of:

Significant injury or sexual assault to another person;

Danger to self, such that a delay would endanger the child's safety or health; or

Damage to property;

The child cannot be located by the supervising person, persons, or entity after documented efforts to locate the child by the supervising person, persons, or entity; or

The child fails to appear for a court proceeding.

If the child has an attorney of record, that attorney must be served with any attachment request made to the court.

A child may not be detained pursuant to an attachment under this subsection (b), unless the child meets the criteria of § 37-1-114.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 22; T.C.A., § 37-222; Acts 2016, ch. 717, § 2; 2018, ch. 1052, § 16; 2019, ch. 312, §§ 4-6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added the present first sentence.

The 2018 amendment added (b); in the present introductory language of (a), substituted “summonses” for “summons” preceding “to the parties” and “a” for “the” following “In case”, and inserted “except as described in subsection (b),”.

The 2019 amendment, in (b)(1), deleted “§37-1-110 or” following “diversion pursuant to”; rewrote (b)(1)(A), which read: “The child poses a significant likelihood of significant injury to another person or significant likelihood of damage to property;”; and added (b)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 717, § 7. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 312, § 11. May 8, 2019.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 11 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Attorney General Opinions. If a juvenile who is adjudicated delinquent absconds from a group home or other non-institutional placement, a petition with a summons should issue; in the event a summons is not effective, the court may issue an order of attachment, OAG 05-008 (1/20/05).

Collateral References.

Liability of parent for support of child institutionalized by juvenile court. 59 A.L.R.3d 636.

37-1-123. Use of detention.

Detention shall not be ordered as a disposition under §37-1-132, and neither a child nor that child's attorney may waive the detention-related prohibitions of that section, including as part of any pre-adjudication agreements.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 46; 2019, ch. 510, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former §37-1-123 (Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 23; 1983, ch. 137, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-223; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 717 § 3, effective July 1, 2016) concerned service of summons was repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 717 § 3, effective July 1, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “be used only for those circumstances expressly authorized by the provisions of this part and shall” preceding “not be ordered”, deleted “§37-1-131(a) or” following “disposition under”, and substituted “that section” for “those provisions”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2019; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect May 21, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 510, § 7. July 1, 2019 at 12:01 a.m.

37-1-124. Conduct of hearing.

Hearings pursuant to this part shall be conducted by the court without a jury, in an informal but orderly manner, separate from other proceedings not included in § 37-1-103.

The district attorney general or city or county attorney, or any attorney, upon request of the court, shall present the evidence in support of the petition and otherwise conduct the proceedings on behalf of the state.

Minutes of all proceedings shall be kept by the court.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 24; T.C.A., § 37-224; Acts 2007, ch. 199, §§ 3, 4; 2016, ch. 600, § 3.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment deleted “, and pursuant to Rule 27 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure” from the end of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 600, § 17. July 1, 2016.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rules 19 and 28 and in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 27 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

37-1-125. Party served by publication — Provisional hearing — Interlocutory order.

If, after reasonable effort, a party cannot be found, or the party's postal address cannot be ascertained, regardless of whether the party is within this state, the court may order service of the summons upon the party by publication in accordance with §§ 21-1-203 and 21-1-204. The published summons shall indicate the general nature of the allegations and where a copy of the petition may be obtained. The hearing shall not be earlier than five (5) days after the date of the last publication.

If service of summons upon a party is made by publication, the court may conduct a provisional hearing upon the allegations of the petition and enter an interlocutory order of disposition if the:

Petition alleges delinquency, unruly conduct, or dependency or neglect of the child;

Summons served upon any party:

States that prior to the final hearing on the petition designated in the summons a provisional hearing thereon will be held at a specified time and place;

Requires the party who is served other than by publication to appear and answer the allegations of the petition at the provisional hearing;

States further that findings of fact and orders of disposition made pursuant to the provisional hearing will become final at the final hearing unless the party served by publication appears at the final hearing; and

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

Child is personally before the court at the provisional hearing.

All provisions of this part applicable to a hearing on a petition, orders of disposition, and other proceedings dependent thereon, apply under this section, but findings of fact and orders of disposition have only interlocutory effect pending the final hearing on the petition. The rights and duties of the party served by publication are not affected, except as provided in subsection (d).

If the party served by publication fails to appear at the final hearing on the petition, the findings of fact and interlocutory orders made become final without further evidence and are governed by this part as if made at the final hearing. If the party appears at the final hearing, the findings and orders shall be vacated and disregarded and the hearing shall proceed upon the allegations of the petition without regard to this section.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 25; T.C.A., § 37-225; Acts 2016, ch. 717, §§ 4, 5.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added present (a); redesignated former (a)-(c) as (b)-(d); and deleted (b)(2)(D) [former (a)(2)(D)], which read, “Otherwise conforms to §37-1-121; and”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 717, § 7. July 1, 2016.

37-1-126. Right to counsel or guardian ad litem — Administrative fee.

A child is entitled to representation by legal counsel at all stages of any delinquency proceedings or proceedings alleging unruly conduct that place the child in jeopardy of being removed from the home pursuant to § 37-1-132(b) and is entitled to a guardian ad litem for proceedings alleging a child to be dependent and neglected or abused.

An adult is entitled to representation by legal counsel at all stages of any proceeding under this part in proceedings involving:

Child abuse prosecutions pursuant to §§ 37-1-412 and 39-15-401;

Contributing to the delinquency or unruly behavior of a child pursuant to § 37-1-156 or contributing to the dependency and neglect of a child pursuant to § 37-1-157;

Violation of compulsory school attendance pursuant to §§ 49-6-3007 and 49-6-3009; or

Criminal contempt.

A parent is entitled to representation by legal counsel at all stages of any proceeding under this part in proceedings involving:

Abuse, dependency or neglect pursuant to § 37-1-102; or

Termination of parental rights pursuant to § 36-1-113.

If the person is indigent, the court shall provide counsel for the indigent person. If a person appears without counsel, the court shall ascertain whether the person knows of the right to counsel and of the right to be provided with counsel by the court if the person is indigent. The court may continue the proceeding to enable a person to obtain counsel and shall provide counsel for an unrepresented indigent person upon request.

In all delinquency hearings or in unruly hearings in which the child may be in jeopardy of being removed from the home as specified in § 37-1-132(b), counsel must be provided for a child not represented by the child's parent, guardian, guardian ad litem or custodian or where the child's interests conflict with the parent, guardian, custodian or guardian ad litem. If the interest of two (2) or more persons conflict, separate counsel may be provided for each of them.

A person is indigent if:

That person does not possess sufficient means to pay reasonable compensation for the services of a competent attorney or guardian ad litem. In determining indigency, the court shall consider the financial resources of the child and the child's parents, legal custodians or guardians; or

In the case of a child, if the child, the child's parents, legal custodians or guardians are financially able to defray a portion or all of the cost of the child’s representation but refuse to do so timely, the court may make written findings determining this as indigency; provided, the court shall assess the administrative fee and costs pursuant to § 37-1-150(g).

Parents, legal custodians, or guardians, or any adult defendants or respondents whose child is provided with court-appointed counsel pursuant to this section, or who themselves are provided with court-appointed counsel pursuant to this section, may be assessed by the court at the time of appointment a nonrefundable administrative fee in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00). The parents, legal custodians, or guardians of a child who is appointed a guardian ad litem may be assessed by the court an administrative fee as provided in this subdivision (c)(1).

The administrative fee shall be assessed only one (1) time per case and shall be waived or reduced by the court upon a finding that the child and the child's parents, legal custodians, or guardians lack financial resources sufficient to pay the fee in such amount. In cases where a guardian ad litem is appointed, the financial resources of the child shall not be considered. The fee may be increased by the court to an amount not in excess of two hundred dollars ($200) upon a finding that the child's parents, legal custodians or guardians, or an adult defendant or respondent possesses sufficient financial resources to pay the fee in such increased amount. The administrative fee shall be payable, at the court's discretion, in a lump sum or in installments; provided, that the fee shall be paid prior to disposition of the case or within two (2) weeks of appointment of counsel, whichever first occurs. Prior to disposition of the case, the clerk of the court shall inform the judge whether the administrative fee has been collected. Failure to pay the administrative fee assessed by the court shall not reduce or in any way affect the rendering of services by court-appointed counsel. The administrative fee shall not be assessed against the child.

The administrative fee shall be separate from, and in addition to, any other contribution or recoupment assessed pursuant to law for defrayal of costs associated with the provision of court-appointed counsel. The clerk of the court shall retain a commission of five percent (5%) of each dollar of administrative fees collected and shall transmit the remaining ninety-five percent (95%) of each such dollar to the state treasurer for deposit in the state's general fund.

If the administrative fee is not paid prior to disposition of the case, then the fee shall be collected in the same manner as costs are collected; provided, that upon disposition of the case, moneys paid to the clerk, including any cash bond posted by or on behalf of a child who has been transferred or is awaiting a transfer hearing pursuant to § 37-1-134 or an adult, shall be allocated to taxes, costs, and fines and then to the administrative fee and any recoupment ordered. The administrative fee and any recoupment or contribution ordered for the services of court-appointed counsel may apply and may be collected even if the charges against the party are dismissed. The court shall have discretion to waive the administrative fee if the case is dismissed.

As part of the clerk's regular monthly report, each clerk of court, who is responsible for collecting administrative fees pursuant to this section, shall file a report with the court, the administrative director of the courts, and the comptroller of the treasury. The report shall indicate the following:

Number of children and adults for whom the court appointed counsel pursuant to this section;

Number of children for whom the court appointed a guardian ad litem pursuant to § 37-1-149;

Number of children and adults for whom the court appointed counsel and waived the administrative fee;

Number of children for whom the court appointed a guardian ad litem and waived the administrative fee;

Number of children and adults from, or on behalf of, whom the clerk collected administrative fees;

Total amount of commissions retained by the clerk from such administrative fees; and

Total amount of administrative fees forwarded by the clerk to the state treasurer.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 26; 1980, ch. 796, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-226; Acts 1997, ch. 547, § 2; 2008, ch. 1084, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 417, § 1; 2012, ch. 857, §§ 1-5; 2018, ch. 1052, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (c)(1), rewrote the first sentence which read: “A child who is provided with court-appointed counsel pursuant to this section, the child’s parents, legal custodians or guardians, or any adult defendant or respondent who is provided with court-appointed counsel pursuant to this section shall be assessed by the court at the time of appointment a nonrefundable administrative fee in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00).”, and in the second sentence substituted “may” for “shall” preceding “be assessed”; in (c)(2), in the second sentence, deleted “child, the” preceding “child’s parents” and substituted “possesses” for “possess” following “respondent”, and, at the end, substituted the present last sentence for “; provided, that willful failure to pay such fee may be weighed by the court when determining appropriate disposition of the case.”; in (c)(4), substituted “a child who has been transferred or is awaiting a transfer hearing pursuant to §37-1-134 or an” for “the child or” preceding “adult” in the second sentence, twice substituted “may” for “shall”, and in the last sentence, substituted “The” for “In cases where a guardian ad litem is appointed, the”; and in (c)(5), in the first sentence, deleted “and with” following “with the court”, deleted “Tennessee” preceding “administrative director”, and inserted “, and the comptroller of the treasury”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rules 13 and 28 and under the Advisory Commission Comments of Rule 30 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.4.

Law Reviews.

A Proposal To Strengthen Juvenile Miranda Rights: Requiring Parental Presence in Custodial Interrogations, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 1355 (2000).

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

The Essence of Justice: Independent, Ethical, and Zealous Advocacy by Juvenile Defenders, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 799 (2014).

37-1-127. Basic rights at hearing.

A party is entitled to the opportunity to introduce evidence and otherwise be heard in the party's own behalf and to cross-examine adverse witnesses.

A child charged with a delinquent act need not be a witness against self-interest or otherwise engage in self-incrimination.

An extra-judicial statement, if obtained in the course of violation of this part or that would be constitutionally inadmissible in a criminal proceeding, shall not be used against the child.

Evidence illegally seized or obtained shall not be received over objection to establish the allegations made against the child.

A confession validly made by a child out of court is insufficient to support an adjudication of delinquency unless it is corroborated in whole or in part by other evidence.

If a child is charged with a delinquent act that could qualify such child as a violent juvenile sexual offender, as defined by § 40-39-202, such child shall be given verbal and written notice of the violent juvenile sexual offender registration requirements prior to a hearing on whether the child committed such act.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 27; T.C.A., § 37-227; Acts 2011, ch. 483, § 1.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 28 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.12.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 11; 21 Tenn. Juris., Rape, § 11.

Law Reviews.

A Proposal To Strengthen Juvenile Miranda Rights: Requiring Parental Presence in Custodial Interrogations, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 1355 (2000).

Guidelines for Juvenile Court Practice (Andrew J. Shookhoff), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 5 (1983).

The DOJ Comes to Town: An Argument for Legislative Reform When the Juvenile Court Fails to Protect Due Process Rights, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 921 (2014).

Toward Fundamental Fairness in the Kangaroo Courtroom: The Due Process Case Against Statutes Presumptively Closing Juvenile Proceedings, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1751 (2001).